Utah statutes.
53B-23-106.   State Board of Regents to make rules.

The State Board of Regents shall adopt rules consistent with this section for its implementation and administration, including rules addressing:

(1)  the designation of materials considered "required or essential to student success";

(2)  the determination of the availability of technology for the conversion of nonprinted materials pursuant to Section 53B-23-103 and the conversion of mathematics and science materials pursuant to Section 53B-23-102; and

(3)  the procedures and standards relating to distribution of files and materials pursuant to Section 53B-23-103.

